Colorado, session 2026A, HB1221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The general assembly has an ongoing responsibility to review,
evaluate, and update the state tax code within constitutional limitations
to ensure that the state tax code is effective, equitable, and aligned with
Colorado's priorities;
(b) (I) (A) The Colorado executive compensation income tax
deduction has changed frequently in recent years due to changes in the
federal tax code;
(B) A taxpayer can claim the executive compensation income tax
deduction regardless of whether the executives earning that compensation
reside or work in Colorado; and
(C) To ensure that the state tax code is effective, equitable, and
aligned with Colorado's priorities, and insulated from changes in the
federal tax code, the executive compensation income tax deduction
-2- 1221

should be limited to only an income tax deduction for a set amount of
executive compensation.
(II) (A) The Colorado net operating loss income tax deduction,
like the Colorado executive compensation income tax deduction, has
changed frequently in recent years due to changes in the federal tax code;
(B) C corporations that have the majority of their activities and
investment outside of Colorado may claim the Colorado net operating
loss income tax deduction; and
(C) To ensure that the state tax code is effective, equitable, and
aligned with Colorado's priorities, and insulated from changes in the
federal tax code, the net operating loss income tax deduction should be
limited.

(c) (I) Colorado state income tax is determined based on the
amount of a person's federal taxable income;
(II) Recent federal law modified the computation of federal
taxable income and so impacted Colorado state income tax revenue;
(III) The net impact of the recent federal modification to the
computation of federal taxable income was a reduction in state income
tax revenue;
(IV) The amount and availability of the family affordability tax
credit is determined in part by the amount of state income tax revenue;
(V) Therefore, by modifying the computation of federal taxable
income, federal law impacted the amount and availability of the family
affordability tax credit; and
(VI) At least in part due to the enactment of recent federal law, the
family affordability tax credit will not be available for the 2026 state
-3- 1221

income tax year and will be available in a reduced amount for income tax
years 2027 and 2028;
(d) (I) In establishing the family affordability tax credit, the
general assembly found and declared that:
(A) Colorado families struggle to afford many necessary goods
and services, such as child care, housing, and health care. Eighty-three
percent of Colorado parents worry that their children won't be able to
afford to live in the state in the future;
(B) Targeted tax credits are a proven tool to lift families out of
poverty. Research has shown that families that claim these types of tax
credits, such as the state and federal child tax credit and the state and
federal earned income tax credit, have better health, improved schooling
outcomes, and increased adult earning potential. As the cost of raising
children has increased, a family affordability tax credit is critical for the
well-being of many children and families across Colorado.
(C) According to the Institute on Taxation and Economic Policy,
"[t]o cut child poverty rates by half, the majority of states would require
a base credit value of between three thousand dollars and four thousand
five hundred dollars per child plus a twenty percent boost for young
children." When coupled with the state and federal earned income tax
credit and the state and federal child tax credit, the additional investment
provided by the family affordability tax credit would establish Colorado
as a national leader in equitable economic policy.
(D) Colorado is dealing with rising costs and funding shortfalls in
many areas across our state, and it is necessary to provide tax credits to
the people who need it most in a way that will do the most good.
Establishing the family affordability tax credit is a proven way to do that;
-4- 1221

and
(E) By prioritizing the state's lowest-income families, expanding
the child age eligibility, and including more families, the state can provide
research-backed investments for families. Through thoughtful and
strategic investment, Colorado can cut child poverty nearly in half.
(II) Therefore, it is a priority of Colorado to provide a tax credit
that targets the same taxpayers that the family affordability tax credit
targeted, to offset the reduction in the family affordability tax credit.
(e) (I) This House Bill 26-1221 constitutes a single comprehensive
tax policy change that better aligns the state tax code with Colorado's
decision to prioritize low- and middle-income families with children by,
at least partially, mitigating the effect of recent federal law on the family
affordability tax credit by creating a tax credit that targets the same
population targeted by the family affordability tax credit while also
mitigating the reduction to wealthy taxpayers and corporations' tax
burdens as a result of recent federal law;
(II) The income tax credit created in this House Bill 26-1221
reduces state tax revenue in an amount equal to or greater than the
amount of state revenue gain attributable to the changes made in this
House Bill 26-1221;
(III) Any net district revenue gain resulting from the tax policy
change in this House Bill 26-1221 is incidental and de minimis; and
(IV) Therefore, consistent with the Colorado Supreme Court's
holding in TABOR Found. v. Reg'l Transp. Dist., 2018 CO 29, that a tax
policy change that causes either no net district tax revenue gain or a net
district tax revenue gain that is only incidental and de minimis does not
require voter approval under section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state
-5- 1221

constitution, this House Bill 26-1221 is not a tax policy change that
requires voter approval.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-22-131 as
follows:
39-22-131. Family affordability credit - tax preference
performance statement - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT THE PURPOSES OF THE INCOME TAX CREDIT CREATED IN
THIS SECTION ARE THE SAME AS THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT:
TO SUBSTANTIALLY REDUCE CHILD POVERTY, MAKE COLORADO MORE
AFFORDABLE FOR FAMILIES, AND HELP FAMILIES AFFORD EXPENSES
ASSOCIATED WITH HAVING CHILDREN BY PROVIDING TAX RELIEF FOR
CERTAIN INDIVIDUALS.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL MEASURE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE INCOME TAX CREDIT CREATED IN THIS SECTION IN
COMBINATION WITH THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT AND, IN THE
SAME MANNER AS THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR
MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT
BY DETERMINING THE NUMBER OF COLORADO FAMILIES THAT, AFTER
CLAIMING A CREDIT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND THE FAMILY
AFFORDABILITY CREDIT, NO LONGER FALL BELOW THE FEDERAL POVERTY
LEVEL IN THE TAX YEAR IN WHICH THEY CLAIMED THE CREDITS.
-6- 1221

(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CREDIT" MEANS THE CREDIT AGAINST INCOME TAX CREATED
IN THIS SECTION.
(b) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(c) "ELIGIBLE CHILD" MEANS A QUALIFYING CHILD, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 152 (c) OF THE "INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986"; EXCEPT
THAT THE AGE REQUIREMENTS ARE AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS
(3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(b)(I), AND (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) "FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL" MEANS THE POVERTY LINE THAT
IS REQUIRED TO BE UPDATED ANNUALLY WITHIN THE FEDERAL POVERTY
GUIDELINES ADOPTED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 9902 (2).
(e) "INFLATION" MEANS THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE
UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD FOR ALL
ITEMS PAID BY ALL URBAN CONSUMERS, OR ITS APPLICABLE SUCCESSOR
INDEX.
(f) "JOINT FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME" MEANS, FOR INCOME
TAX YEARS COMMENCING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2034, AN AMOUNT OF
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS
INCOME DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION
39-22-130 (7) TO BE NECESSARY FOR TWO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO
FILE A JOINT RETURN TO QUALIFY FOR THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX
CREDIT PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-22-130 FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR
COMMENCING ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(g) "SINGLE FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME" MEANS, FOR INCOME
-7- 1221

TAX YEARS COMMENCING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2034, AN AMOUNT OF
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF ADJUSTED GROSS
INCOME DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION
39-22-130 (7) TO BE NECESSARY FOR A SINGLE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO
FILES A SINGLE RETURN TO QUALIFY FOR THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX
CREDIT PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-22-130 FOR THE INCOME TAX YEAR
COMMENCING ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(3) (a) IN ADDITION TO THE CHILD TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY
SECTION 39-22-129 AND THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT
ALLOWED BY SECTION 39-22-130, FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO FILES A
SINGLE RETURN IS ALLOWED A CREDIT AGAINST THE INCOME TAXES
IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22 FOR:
(I) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
FIVE YEARS OLD OR YOUNGER AT THE CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SIX
YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT LESS THAN SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD AT THE
CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SEVENTY-FIVE
PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT ALLOWED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) IN ADDITION TO THE CHILD TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY SECTION
39-22-129 AND THE FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT ALLOWED BY
SECTION 39-22-130, FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, TWO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO FILE A JOINT RETURN
ARE ALLOWED A FAMILY AFFORDABILITY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE
-8- 1221

INCOME TAXES DUE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22 FOR:
(I) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO IS
FIVE YEARS OLD OR YOUNGER AT THE CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN
AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) EACH ELIGIBLE CHILD OF THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO IS
SIX YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT LESS THAN SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD AT THE
CLOSE OF THE INCOME TAX YEAR IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SEVENTY-FIVE
PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT ALLOWED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, FOR
INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE
CREDIT AMOUNTS IN:
(I) SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION ARE REDUCED, BUT NOT
BELOW ZERO, BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO SIX AND EIGHT HUNDRED
SEVENTY-FIVE ONE-THOUSANDTHS PERCENT FOR EACH FIVE THOUSAND
DOLLARS BY WHICH A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME
EXCEEDS THE SINGLE FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME; AND
(II) SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION ARE REDUCED, BUT NOT
BELOW ZERO, BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO SIX AND EIGHT HUNDRED
SEVENTY-FIVE ONE-THOUSANDTHS PERCENT FOR EACH FIVE THOUSAND
DOLLARS BY WHICH TWO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS' ADJUSTED GROSS
INCOME EXCEEDS THE JOINT FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME.
(b) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADJUST THE JOINT FILER ADJUSTED
BASED INCOME AND SINGLE FILER ADJUSTED BASE INCOME TO REFLECT
INFLATION FOR EACH INCOME TAX YEAR IN WHICH THE CREDIT DESCRIBED
-9- 1221

IN THIS SECTION IS ALLOWED IF CUMULATIVE INFLATION SINCE THE LAST
ADJUSTMENT, WHEN APPLIED TO THE CURRENT LIMITS, RESULTS IN AN
INCREASE OF AT LEAST ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS WHEN THE ADJUSTED
LIMITS ARE ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS.
(5) BEGINNING WITH THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST THAT LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF PRESENTS IN DECEMBER OF
2027, AND FOR EACH QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE FORECAST
THEREAFTER, AS PART OF THE QUARTERLY DECEMBER REVENUE
FORECAST, LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL DETERMINE:
(a) FOR THE CURRENT INCOME TAX YEAR, A PROJECTION OF THE
AMOUNT OF REVENUE GAIN DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE CHANGES
MADE IN THIS HOUSE BILL 26-1221, NOTWITHSTANDING THE TAX CREDIT
CREATED IN THIS SECTION;
(b) A DOLLAR AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT AVAILABLE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTIONS (3)(a)(I) AND (3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, WHICH DOLLAR
AMOUNT MUST BE THE SAME FOR BOTH SUBSECTIONS (3)(a)(I) AND
(3)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, SUCH THAT THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL PROJECTS, FOR THE CURRENT STATE INCOME TAX YEAR, THAT
THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF CREDITS CLAIMED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3) WILL EQUAL THE DOLLAR AMOUNT OF REVENUE GAIN
THAT STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL DETERMINES, PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, IS DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
CHANGES MADE IN THIS HOUSE BILL 26-1221, NOTWITHSTANDING THE
TAX CREDIT CREATED IN THIS SECTION.
(6) NO LATER THAN TWO WEEKS BEFORE THE QUARTERLY
DECEMBER REVENUE FORECAST THAT LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF
PRESENTS IN DECEMBER OF 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER REVENUE
-10- 1221

FORECAST THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DELIVER A REPORT TO
THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL THAT DESCRIBES THE REVENUE
GAIN DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE CHANGES MADE IN THIS HOUSE
BILL 26-1221 FOR THE PREVIOUS INCOME TAX YEAR, NOTWITHSTANDING
THE TAX CREDIT CREATED IN THIS SECTION.
(7) IN THE CASE OF A PART-YEAR RESIDENT, THE CREDIT ALLOWED
UNDER THIS SECTION IS APPORTIONED IN THE RATIO DETERMINED UNDER
SECTION 39-22-110 (1).
(8) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT
CONSIDERED TO BE INCOME OR RESOURCES FOR THE PURPOSE OF
DETERMINING ELIGIBILITY FOR THE PAYMENT OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
BENEFITS AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE BENEFITS AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE
LAW OR FOR A PAYMENT MADE UNDER ANY OTHER PUBLICLY FUNDED
PROGRAM.
(9) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT EXCEEDS THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S INCOME TAXES DUE IS
REFUNDED TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
(10) THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED AND ENCOURAGED TO
DEVELOP A MEANS OF REFUNDING THE CREDITS ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION
TO RESIDENT INDIVIDUALS WHO QUALIFY FOR THE CREDITS IN TWELVE
EQUAL MONTHLY REFUNDS RATHER THAN ANNUALLY.
(11) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 39-21-304 (4), THE CREDIT DOES
NOT REPEAL AFTER A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TAX YEARS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-304, add
(2)(m) as follows:
39-22-304. Net income of corporation - legislative declaration
- definitions - repeal.
-11- 1221

(2) There shall be added to federal taxable income:
(m) FOR STATE INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, THE AMOUNT, IF ANY, IN EXCESS OF TWO HUNDRED AND
FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS THAT THE TAXPAYER CLAIMED AS A
DEDUCTION ON THE TAXPAYER'S FEDERAL TAX RETURN PURSUANT TO THE
EMPLOYEE REMUNERATION DEDUCTION ALLOWED PURSUANT TO SECTION
162 (m) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-504, amend
(1)(b) and (3)(b); and add (1)(c) and (3)(c) as follows:
39-22-504. Net operating losses.
(1) (b) For losses incurred after December 31, 2017, AND ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, the eighty percent limitation set forth in
section 172 (a)(2) of the internal revenue code shall apply without regard
to the amendments made in section 2303 of the March 2020 "Coronavirus
Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act", Pub.L. 116-136.
(c) FOR LOSSES INCURRED AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE EIGHTY
PERCENT LIMITATION SET FORTH IN SECTION 172 (a)(2) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE SHALL BE APPLIED AS A SEVENTY PERCENT LIMITATION
BUT SHALL OTHERWISE APPLY WITHOUT REGARD TO THE AMENDMENTS
MADE IN SECTION 2303 OF THE MARCH 2020 "CORONAVIRUS AID, RELIEF,
AND ECONOMIC SECURITY ACT", PUB.L. 116-136.
(3) (b) Net operating losses of corporations generated in income
tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2021, AND BEFORE JANUARY
1, 2027, may be carried forward for twenty years. Net operating losses of
corporations may not be carried back to an earlier tax year.
(c) NET OPERATING LOSSES OF CORPORATIONS GENERATED IN
INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, MAY BE
-12- 1221

CARRIED FORWARD FOR TEN YEARS. NET OPERATING LOSSES OF
CORPORATIONS MAY NOT BE CARRIED BACK TO AN EARLIER TAX YEAR.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-13- 1221